pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.aff
SFX d Y 30
SFX d   o               idade           [^çgi]o
SFX d   ço              cidade          ço
SFX d   go              guidade         go
SFX d   o               edade           [^r]io
SFX d   o               edade           [^áó]rio
SFX d   ário            ariedade        ário
SFX d   ório            oriedade        ório
SFX d   e               idade           e
SFX d   0               idade           r
SFX d   0               idade           [^v][^q]l
SFX d   vel             bilidade        [^áíú]vel
SFX d   ável            abilidade       ável
SFX d   ível            ibilidade       ível
SFX d   úvel            ubilidade       úvel
SFX d   z               cidade          z
SFX d   o               idades          [^çgi]o
SFX d   ço              cidades         ço
SFX d   go              guidades        go
SFX d   o               edades          [^r]io
SFX d   o               edades          [^áó]rio
SFX d   ário            ariedades       ário
SFX d   ório            oriedades       ório
SFX d   e               idades          e
SFX d   0               idades          r
SFX d   0               idades          [^v][^q]l
SFX d   vel             bilidades       [^áí]vel
SFX d   ável            abilidades      ável
SFX d   ível            ibilidades      ível
SFX d   úvel            ubilidades      úvel
SFX d   z               cidades         z

SFX i Y 26
SFX i   go              guismo          go
SFX i   go              guismos         go
SFX i   o               ismo            [^cçã]o
SFX i   co              quismo          co
SFX i   ço              cismo           ço
SFX i   ção             cionismo        ção
SFX i   a               ismo            [^icg]a
SFX i   a               smo             ia
SFX i   ca              quismo          ca
SFX i   ga              guismo          ga
SFX i   e               ismo            e
SFX i   0               ismo            [lr]
SFX i   ês              esismo          ês
SFX i   m               nismo           m
SFX i   o               ismos           [^cçã]o
SFX i   co              quismos         co
SFX i   ço              cismos          ço
SFX i   ção             cionismos       ção
SFX i   a               ismos           [^icg]a
SFX i   a               smos            ia
SFX i   ca              quismos         ca
SFX i   ga              guismos         ga
SFX i   e               ismos           e
SFX i   0               ismos           [lr]
SFX i   ês              esismos         ês
SFX i   m               nismos          m

SFX t Y 24
SFX t   o               ista            [^cçãi]o
SFX t   co              quista          co
SFX t   ço              cista           ço
SFX t   ção             cionista        ção
SFX t   são             sionista        são
SFX t   io              ísta            io
SFX t   a               ista            [^içg]a
SFX t   a               sta             ia
SFX t   ça              cista           ça
SFX t   a               uista           ga
SFX t   e               ista            e
SFX t   0               ista            [lr]
SFX t   o               istas           [^cçã]o
SFX t   co              quistas         co
SFX t   ço              cistas          ço
SFX t   ção             cionistas       ção
SFX t   são             sionistas       são
SFX t   io              ístas           io
SFX t   a               istas           [^içg]a
SFX t   a               stas            ia
SFX t   ça              cistas          ça
SFX t   a               uistas          ga
SFX t   e               istas           e
SFX t   0               istas           [lr]

SFX l Y 28
SFX l   o               inho            [^cgçãi]o
SFX l   co              quinho          co
SFX l   ço              cinho           ço
SFX l   o               uinho           go
SFX l   0               zinho           ão
SFX l   e               inho            e
SFX l   0               inho            [^ê][sz]
SFX l   ês              esinho          ês
SFX l   0               zinho           [irunl]
SFX l   ó               ozinho          ó
SFX l   ô               ozinho          ô
SFX l   é               ezinho          é
SFX l   ú               uzinho          ú
SFX l   m               nzinho          m
SFX l   o               inhos           [^cgçãi]o
SFX l   co              quinhos         co
SFX l   ço              cinhos          ço
SFX l   o               uinhos          go
SFX l   0               zinhos          ão
SFX l   e               inhos           e
SFX l   0               inhos           [^ê][sz]
SFX l   ês              esinhos         ês
SFX l   0               zinhos          [irunl]
SFX l   ó               ozinhos         ó
SFX l   ô               ozinhos         ô
SFX l   é               ezinhos         é
SFX l   ú               uzinhos         ú
SFX l   m               nzinhos         m

SFX h Y 29
SFX h   ês              esinha          ês
SFX h   ês              esinhas         ês
SFX h   o               inha            [^cgçãi]o
SFX h   a               inha            [^cgç]a
SFX h   co              quinha          co
SFX h   ço              cinha           ço
SFX h   o               uinha           go
SFX h   ca              quinha          ca
SFX h   ça              cinha           ça
SFX h   a               uinha           ga
SFX h   á               azinha          á
SFX h   ã               azinha          ã
SFX h   0               zinha           ãe
SFX h   e               inha            [^ã]e
SFX h   0               zinha           [irunl]
SFX h   m               nzinha          m
SFX h   o               inhas           [^cgçãi]o
SFX h   a               inhas           [^cgç]a
SFX h   ca              quinhas         ca
SFX h   ça              cinhas          ça
SFX h   a               uinhas          ga
SFX h   co              quinhas         co
SFX h   ço              cinhas          ço
SFX h   o               uinhas          go
SFX h   á               azinhas         á
SFX h   ã               azinhas         ã
SFX h   e               inhas           [^ã]e
SFX h   0               zinhas          [irunl]
SFX h   m               nzinhas         m

SFX z Y 8
SFX z   0               zinhas          [^ã][eo]
SFX z   0               inhas           l
SFX z   0               zinho           [^ã][eo]
SFX z   0               inho            l
SFX z   0               zinha           [^ã][eo]
SFX z   0               inha            l
SFX z   0               zinhos          [^ã][eo]
SFX z   0               inhos           l

SFX c Y 8
SFX c   r               ção             [ae]r
SFX c   r               ção             [^zg]ir
SFX c   zir             ção             zir
SFX c   r               sição           por
SFX c   r               ções            [ae]r
SFX c   r               ções            [^zg]ir
SFX c   zir             ções            zir
SFX c   r               sições          por


SFX M Y 4
SFX M   r               mento           [ai]r
SFX M   er              imento          er
SFX M   r               mentos          [ai]r
SFX M   er              imentos         er

SFX n Y 6
SFX n   r               nte             [ae]r
SFX n   ir              ente            ir
SFX n   r               nente           or
SFX n   r               ntes            [ae]r
SFX n   ir              entes           ir
SFX n   r               nentes          or

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   r               dor             [aei]r
SFX D   r               dora            [aei]r
SFX D   r               dores           [aei]r
SFX D   r               doras           [aei]r

SFX v Y 6
SFX v   ar              ável            ar
SFX v   er              ível            er
SFX v   ir              ível            ir
SFX v   ar              áveis           ar
SFX v   er              íveis           er
SFX v   ir              íveis           ir
