pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.dic
acampar/XYPLM
acomodar/XYPLScMvR
acorrentar/XYPLSM
adivinhar/XYPLcD
advogado/fplhzx
afetivo/fpdm
afobar/XYPLMNBWc
aforar/XYPLcMD
agitar/XYPLcMDnvNBW
aglutinar/XYPLDMBcnvR
alastrar/XYPLMDn
alergia/pt
alpino/fpti
ameaçar/XYPLDn
amortecer/XYPLMD
ancestral/pmd
andar/pXYLMnvD
animal/ptid
ansioso/fplhms
anteceder/XYPLn
aplanar/XYPLcDM
arejar/XYPLMD
arguir/YPLDcnv
arranjar/XYPLDMWRS
artrite/pi
assexual/dpx
assinalar/XYPLDMcnvE
assoberbar/XYPLMnN
atomizar/XYPLDc
atribuir/KPLDcvRU
atuar/XYPLDc
auto/pti
avacalhar/XYPLMcB
ave/ptz
azul/psz
bailarino/fplhx
bairro/plit
banal/dmp
beiçudo/fplh
berro/plj
bipolarizar/XYPLnc
bituca/ph
bloquear/ZYPLDMNnSU
bolchevo/*it
bombardear/ZYPLMn
bonde/pl
branco/fplhjksG
brasileiro/fplhjkismGA
caboclo/fplh
cabrocha/ph
caixa/phjktx
calcinar/XYPLcnv
caloso/fd
caneta/ph
canhoto/fplhiG
canto/pl
capitular/XYLcnR
carreira/phit
cascata/ph
caseiro/fplhimsx
caucionar/XYPLn
causar/XYPLDcn
cedo/l
cercar/XYPLDMNW
cheiroso/fplhs
chuchu/pl
cinefilia/pt
classe/pitFu
codorna/ph
coercitivo/fpdm
cogitar/XYPLcví
colaborar/XYLcn
colocar/XYPLDcRé
coloproctologia/ptr
começo/plR
comparativo/fpmit
condenar/XYPLDMNWcvES
condutivo/fpdA
confirmar/XYPLDNcnvERS
conglomerar/XYLc
conservar/XYPLNWnvjk
constitucional/pdmitsAI
construciono/*itRS
continuar/XYPLScDB
contrastar/XYPLDcnví
corrida/sh
corrosivo/fpdA
cortar/XYPLMnRé
cosmologia/pqrt
coxudo/fplh
cremar/XYPLcD
crescer/XYLMW
cubo/ptil
decorar/XYPLDcvNWRé
definir/XYPLDBNWcvEIRUé
defunto/fplh
demonizar/XYPLc
depauperar/XYPLcMDn
dependente/pmstxI
derrogar/XYPLDMcnví
desenho/ptlW
desfolhar/XYPLDMcn
desluvar/XYPLM
deteriorar/XYPLcMnv
detetive/pz
diabolizar/XYPLnc
didata/ip
difusivo/fpd
dilacerar/XYPLcMDnv
dissecar/XYPLcDn
dobrar/XYPLDMNWvRSí
dual/ptid
edificar/XYPLDcnvRS
emascular/XYPLcU
emenda/phu
emigrar/XYLcD
empedrar/XYPLMD
enfartar/XYPLMé
engambelar/XYPLcD
engripar/XYPLMnS
entender/XYPLDMvSu
enternecer/XYPLMB
erudito/fpmis
escabroso/fpdm
escafandro/pt
escangalhar/XYPLc
escarificar/XYPLDcn
escracho/pl
esmaecer/XYPLM
esplendecer/XYLn
esquerda/phiGAx
esterilizar/XYPLDcn
estoque/pt
estrangeiro/fpitGA
estremar/XYPLv
estudante/pzx
evocar/XYPLcDnv
exaltar/XYPLDMNWBcnU
expressivo/fpdmsI
extrativo/fpti
faccioso/fpdi
fartar/XYPLcv
fatiar/XYPLDMWSé
fato/pl
ferver/XYPLDMcnR
fervilhar/XYLPn
filatelia/pti
filiar/XYPLcRSé
firme/mz
floresta/ph
folheto/pl
fragmento/pt
fugaz/pmd
fumar/XYPLD
funcional/pmidt
fuzilar/XYPLcMDn
garoto/fplhjkGx
glicar/*cnA
goela/ph
golpe/plitWU
greve/pitEO
grilo/pl
gripe/phz
hidratar/XYPLDNWcnvS
hierarquizar/XYPLcn
homoafetivo/fpd
hospedar/XYPLDvg
humilde/pjkmszS
humor/pwi
importunar/XYPLcD
impuro/fpd
incrustar/XYPLDcnS
individual/pdmitA
inefável/dp
infantil/pdims
inferir/ZYPLv
inocente/pmz
inquietar/XYPLDMcS
instrumentar/XYPLDc
intangível/pdm
interfacear/ZYPLM
invaginar/XYPLcn
irresistível/dpm
isomorfo/pfi
Jaime/l
jornalista/phx
legislar/XYPLDcnvU
leite/pwl
levantar/XYPLDMé
leve/plhmszF
limpar/XYPLDnU
lira/pi
lulu/plh
macete/plW
magistral/pmd
malabar/pti
maxidesvalorizar/XYPLc
meigo/fplhsG
menear/ZYPLMDv
mentiroso/fplhms
militante/pmix
minguar/YLNWn
modelo/pljkitux
modificar/XYPLDWcví
mole/plz
mover/XYPLMDnv
mucoso/fdpu
namorar/XYPLcMDv
natural/pmtidsA
neurologia/qtr
ninfeta/ph
nocautear/ZYPLD
nome/pljWu
nortear/ZYPLDMcnS
obsequioso/mdfp
ovular/XYPLc
oxigenar/XYPLDcnvERS
pacheco/piG
panorama/pt
patrocinar/XYPLD
pauta/ph
pecaminoso/fpdm
pequeno/lpfsh
perpetrar/XYPLcDn
pesar/XYPLDvB
pessoalizar/XYPLnc
planeta/phx
porra-louca/iG
possessivo/fpdm
poupar/XYPLD
praguejar/XYPLMD
primitivo/fpdmit
profanar/XYPLcDv
professor/fplhx
punir/XYPLDcvUí
punível/pd
puto/pflhsG!
racial/pim
radicalizar/XYPLcnS
receptar/XYPLDc
regalo/pti
regularizar/XYPLDcU
relampaguear/ZYLMn
relegar/XYPLcv
retangular/pd
retorquir/CPLví
revelar/XYPLDcnvé
reverberar/XYPLcn
riso/pl
rixa/ph
saxofone/pt
secular/pmdit
significar/XYPLDcnR
similar/pmd
sindicar/XYPLDcví
sinterizar/XYPLc
sinuca/ph
soerguer/XYPLM
soro/pl
sublevar/XYPLcn
surreal/pdimtG
susceptível/pdmI
tentar/XYPLcMnN
teoria/pitu
testemunhar/XYPLDv
titica/ph
topo/pl
trinchar/XYPLDnS
triste/fplhjkmsz
tropical/pdmituO
trucidar/XYPLcDnM
ufania/pit
unificar/XYPLDBcnRSé
vazar/XYPLMDWnv
vedete/pix
vela/ph
verde/plhjks
visual/pmd
zoar/XYPLDNWcjk
